Utah statutes.
26-2-4.   Content and form of certificates and reports.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), to promote and maintain nationwide uniformity in the vital records system, the forms of certificates, certification, reports, and other documents and records required by this chapter or the rules implementing this chapter shall include as a minimum the items recommended by the federal agency responsible for national vital statistics, subject to approval, additions, and modifications by the department.

(2)  Certificates, certifications, forms, reports, other documents and records, and the form of communications between persons required by this chapter shall be prepared in the format prescribed by department rule.

(3)  All vital records shall include the date of filing.

(4)  Certificates, certifications, forms, reports, other documents and records, and communications between persons required by this chapter may be signed, filed, verified, registered, and stored by photographic, electronic, or other means as prescribed by department rule.

(5)  The state:

(a)  may collect the Social Security number of a deceased individual; and

(b)  may not include the Social Security number of an individual on a certificate of death.

